Washington statutes.
RCW 19.225.905

Relation to electronic signatures in global and national commerce act.

Chapter 13, Laws of 2016 sp. sess. modifies, limits, or supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7003(b).

[ 2016 sp.s. c 13 s 12.]